West Virginia, session 2025, HB2779.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 36. Cameras required in school buildings. §18-36-1. Requiring cameras to be placed in classrooms and other rooms in which children are present. (a) All schools in West Virginia must place cameras in hallways, stairwells, classrooms, and all other rooms in which students are present, with the exception that bathroom stalls, showers, and locker rooms shall not have cameras where children can be in a state of undress. (b) The recorded footage from the cameras shall be maintained for a full year.